Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3656] AESTHETIC MANDATES PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Residential construction materials and methods. new text end new text begin A municipality must not impose requirements on residential developments related to construction materials or methods, including architectural elements, building egress, durability, energy efficiency, or light access requirements, except as required by the State Building Code, as defined by section 326B.121, or other state or federal law or rule. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Historic preservation exemption. new text end new text begin Properties in a historic district under section 138.73, are exempt from this provision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Interim ordinance. new text end new text begin No municipality shall enact an interim ordinance as provided under section 462.355, subdivision 4, related to the policy changes in this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end